Wisconsin, session 2025, AB816.
do enact as follows:AB816,11Section 1. 15.105 (34) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,3,4215.105 (34) Office of the public affairs network. There is created an 1office of the public affairs network, which is attached to the department of 2administration under s. 15.03. The office shall be under the direction and 3supervision of a director, who shall be appointed by the public affairs network board 4and serve at the pleasure of the board.AB816,25Section 2. 15.105 (35) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,3,10615.105 (35) Public affairs network board. There is created a public affairs 7network board, which is attached to the department of administration under s. 815.03. The board shall meet quarterly and may meet at other times on the call of 9the chairperson or a majority of its members. The board consists of the following 10members:AB816,3,1111(a) The governor, or his or her designee.AB816,3,1212(b) Two public members appointed by the governor for a 4-year term.AB816,3,1413(c) One senator appointed by the president of the senate and one senator 14appointed by the minority leader of the senate.AB816,3,1715(d) One representative to the assembly appointed by the speaker of the 16assembly and one representative to the assembly appointed by the minority leader 17of the assembly.AB816,318Section 3. 16.004 (22) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 19is repealed.AB816,420Section 4. 16.095 of the statutes is created to read:AB816,3,222116.095 Office of the public affairs network. (1) Definitions. In this 22section:AB816,3,2323(a) “Board” means the public affairs network board.AB816,3,2424(b) “Director” means the director appointed under s. 15.105 (34).AB816,4,11(c) “Office” means the office of the public affairs network.AB816,4,92(d) “State government proceedings” includes floor sessions of the senate and 3assembly, meetings of legislative committees, meetings of executive branch 4agencies, supreme court and other judicial proceedings, news conferences by 5legislators or other government officials relating to legislative, judicial, or executive 6branch official business, and civic events directly related to legislative, judicial, or 7executive branch official business. “State government proceedings” does not 8include campaign events, or news conferences or civic events related to campaign 9events.AB816,4,1210(2) Duties of the public affairs network board. The board shall appoint 11the director as provided in s. 15.105 (34) and oversee the operations of the office to 12ensure the conditions in sub. (3) are met.AB816,4,1513(3) Administration of the public affairs network. The office shall, under 14the direction and supervision of the director, administer a public affairs network in 15this state that satisfies all of the following:AB816,4,2016(a) The public affairs network shall provide unedited live video and audio 17coverage, including online, of state government proceedings, including floor 18sessions of the senate and assembly, meetings of legislative committees, meetings of 19executive branch agencies, supreme court and other judicial proceedings, news 20conferences, and civic events.AB816,4,2221(b) The public affairs network shall provide coverage by live stream online of 22all legislative proceedings that are open to the public.AB816,5,223(c) The public affairs network shall permanently maintain and provide online 1public access to unedited digital archives of its coverage of state government 2proceedings specified in pars. (a) and (b).AB816,5,53(d) The public affairs network may not impose a requirement, including a 4requirement to register online, that restricts or burdens the public’s access to any 5content provided under pars. (a) to (c).AB816,5,76(e) The public affairs network shall be operated in a manner that is strictly 7nonpartisan.AB816,58Section 5. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 9insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB816,615Section 6. 20.505 (1) (ay) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,5,181620.505 (1) (ay) WisconsinEye archives. A sum sufficient to fund a contract to 17obtain the digital archives, and purchase equipment, of the WisconsinEye Public 18Affairs Network, Inc.AB816,719Section 7. 20.505 (1) (az) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,5,222020.505 (1) (az) Office of the public affairs network. Biennially, the amounts in 21the schedule for the general program operations of the office of the public affairs 22network under s. 16.095.AB816,823Section 8. 20.855 (4) (dt) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2415, is repealed.AB816,91Section 9. 20.923 (6) (ak) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,6,3220.923 (6) (ak) Administration, department of; office of the public affairs 3network: director.AB816,104Section 10. 230.08 (2) (ym) of the statutes is created to read:AB816,6,65230.08 (2) (ym) The director for the office of the public affairs network in the 6department of administration.AB816,117Section 11. Nonstatutory provisions.AB816,6,138(1) Consultation with the educational communications board. The 9department of administration and the public affairs network board shall consult 10with the educational communications board regarding best practices, based on the 11educational communication board’s expertise and experiences developed through 12its duties and powers under ss. 39.11 and 39.115, in establishing and maintaining a 13public affairs network.AB816,6,2314(2) WisconsinEye digital archives. The department of administration 15shall attempt to obtain the complete digital archives of the WisconsinEye Public 16Affairs Network, Inc., and may contract with the WisconsinEye Public Affairs 17Network, Inc., or its successor, in order to obtain the archives and, if the department 18determines it is in the public interest to do so, to purchase broadcast and other 19equipment owned by the WisconsinEye Public Affairs Network, Inc. If the 20department obtains the digital archives, the department shall permanently 21maintain and provide online public access to the entire digital archives obtained by 22the department and may not impose any restriction, including a requirement to 23register, for access to any of the content. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab816 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab816 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB816 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB816 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB816: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting